Tennessee statutes. Title 16 Courts
Part 50

Compensation and Qualifications of Judges — Jurisdiction

16-15-5001. Classification of counties for determining compensation of judge.

For the purpose of determining the compensation of a general sessions judge, the counties of this state are divided into seven (7) classes as follows:

Counties having a population of more than forty-nine thousand (49,000) constitute counties of the first class;

Counties having a population of more than thirty-eight thousand (38,000) but not more than forty-nine thousand (49,000) constitute counties of the second class;

Counties having a population of more than thirty thousand (30,000) but not more than thirty-eight thousand (38,000) constitute counties of the third class;

Counties having a population of more than twenty-four thousand (24,000) but not more than thirty thousand (30,000) constitute counties of the fourth class;

Counties having a population of more than nineteen thousand (19,000) but not more than twenty-four thousand (24,000) constitute counties of the fifth class;

Counties having a population of more than ten thousand (10,000) but not more than nineteen thousand (19,000) constitute counties of the sixth class; and

Counties having a population of ten thousand (10,000) or less constitute counties of the seventh class.

The class into which a county falls shall be determined by the 1990 federal census and any subsequent federal census or any special census conducted by the department of economic and community development.

For the purpose of determining the compensation of a general sessions judge who presides over a consolidated general sessions court consisting of two (2) or more counties, the populations of all counties served by the court shall be added together, and the resultant sum shall be increased to the next higher classification for the purpose of determining the class of counties in accordance with subsection (a).

Each county served by a consolidated general sessions court shall pay its proportional share of the compensation of the judge or judges of the consolidated court based on a ratio established by using the population of the county according to the latest available census compared to the population of the counties comprising the consolidated general sessions court using the latest available census.

For the purposes of this subsection (c) only, the compensation of such judge shall be based on what a judge of the next higher classification is to receive on September 1, 1998.

If a county is in one class as provided in this section on September 1 of the year in which a judge is elected to office, and after that date the county moves into a lower class on the basis of a subsequent federal census, the salary of the judge shall not be diminished during the time for which the judge was elected.

If a county is in one class as provided in this section on September 1 of the year in which a judge is elected to office and after that date the county moves into a higher class on the basis of a subsequent census, the salary of the judge shall be determined by the higher classification for the remainder of the term for which the judge was elected and subsequent terms of office. In no instance shall a judge's salary, for a county moving into a higher classification, be less than the salary paid prior to the reclassification.

Acts 1988, ch. 698, § 1; 1990, ch. 637, § 1; 1992, ch. 952, § 13; 1993, ch. 347, § 1; 1997, ch. 555, § 1; 2002, ch. 723, § 1; 2003, ch. 256, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1992, ch. 952, § 15 provided that the amendments by that act apply to all matters as to which a notice of appeal is filed from and after May 1, 1992.

Acts 2002, ch. 723, § 1 amended the county classifications described in this section and eliminated Class 8 counties, effective September 1, 2006.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Attorney General Opinions. Salary of general sessions' judge in excess of statutory requirements, OAG 98-0141 (8/7/98).

If a county moves into a higher classification as a result of the 2000 census, the compensation of a general sessions judge for that county should be determined based upon the higher classification for the remainder of the term for which the judge was elected; however, if a county moves into a lower classification as a result of the 2000 census, the compensation of a general sessions judge for that county should be determined based upon the county's previous classification for the remainder of the term for which the judge was elected, OAG 00-123 (8/4/00).

If a county is reclassified as a Class 1 county as a result of the 2000 federal census, and if the compensation to be paid general sessions judges in Class 1 counties is less than the compensation previously received by the general sessions judge in that county as a Class 3 county, then the compensation of such judge would continue to be determined based upon the county's previous classification as a Class 3 county, OAG 00-123 (8/4/00).

Any increase in compensation due to reclassification based upon the results of the 2000 federal census would take effect as of the effective date of the census, or April 1, 2000, OAG 00-123 (8/4/00).

16-15-5002. Time judge must devote to office — Practice of law or other employment.

All general sessions judges in Class 1, 2 or 3 counties shall devote full time to the duties of such office and shall be prohibited from the practice of law or any other employment which conflicts with the performance of their duties as judge.

General sessions judges in Class 4 through Class 8 counties shall be considered part-time judges and shall not be prohibited from the practice of law or other gainful employment while serving as judge except to the extent the practice or employment constitutes a conflict of interest.

Notwithstanding this section to the contrary, a judge of the general sessions court in any county with a population of not less than eighteen thousand three hundred one (18,301) nor more than eighteen thousand four hundred (18,400), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, upon adoption of a resolution by a two-thirds (2/3) majority vote of the county legislative body, shall devote full time to the duties of such office and shall be prohibited from the practice of law or any other employment which conflicts with the performance of their duties as judge.

Acts 1988, ch. 698, § 2; 2018, ch. 921, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2002, ch. 723, § 1 amended the county classifications described in § 16-15-5001 and eliminated Class 8 counties, effective September 1, 2006.

For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 921, § 3. May 1, 2018.

Cross-References. Courts and judicial functions, part-time judges, § 7-3-311.

Law Reviews.

The Impossible Balance: A Tennessee judge makes the case for abolishing state's part-time judgeships (Judge James L. Cotton Jr.), 37 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 12 (2001).

Attorney General Opinions. City attorney may not simultaneously serve as general sessions judge, OAG 98-0131 (7/27/98).

The Lake County general sessions judge is not prohibited from the private practice of law while in office, except to the extent such practice constitutes a conflict of interest, as the private act making the office of Lake County general sessions judge a full-time position was superseded by T.C.A. § 16-15-5002, OAG 02-046 (4/15/02).

If the current Lake County general sessions judge were to resign, the person appointed to fill the vacancy would be part-time, as T.C.A. § 16-15-5002 superseded the private act making the office of Lake County general sessions judge a full-time position, OAG 02-047 (4/15/02).

16-15-5003. Base salaries — Annual supplement — Restrictions on adding jurisdiction — Annual adjustment — Construction.

The annual base salaries for general sessions judges shall be as follows:

Counties of the first class $70,000

Counties of the second class 50,000

Counties of the third class 40,000

Counties of the fourth class 32,000

Counties of the fifth class 26,000

Counties of the sixth class 22,000

Counties of the seventh class 20,000

In addition to the base salary provided by subsection (a), if a general sessions judge in a Class 2 or 3 county has or by operation of law obtains any of the following additional jurisdictions, the general sessions judge shall receive an annual supplement in the amounts indicated below:

Juvenile jurisdiction $20,000

Probate 10,000

Domestic relations 10,000

Workers' compensation 10,000

Regardless of the kind or amount of additional jurisdiction a Class 2 judge may have, the judge shall not receive annual supplements in excess of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000).

Regardless of the kind or amount of additional jurisdiction a Class 3 judge may have, the judge shall not receive annual supplements in excess of forty thousand dollars ($40,000).

In addition to the base salary provided by subsection (a), if a general sessions judge in a Class 4, 5 or 6 county has or by operation of law obtains any of the following additional jurisdictions, the general sessions judge shall receive an annual supplement in the amounts indicated below:

Juvenile jurisdiction $10,000

Probate 5,000

Domestic relations 5,000

Workers' compensation 5,000

Mental health commitments 10,000

Regardless of the kind or amount of additional jurisdiction a Class 4, 5 or 6 judge may have, the judge shall not receive annual supplements in excess of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000).

Upon adoption of a resolution by a two-thirds (2/3) majority vote of the county legislative body, in addition to the base salary and additional supplements stated in subsections (a) and (c), any Class 4, 5 or 6 judge who is required to exercise the duties and powers set forth in title 33, chapter 6, part 4 regarding the emergency custody and hospitalization of persons believed to be mentally ill, due to a mental hospital or treatment source being located in the county where the judge presides, the judge shall receive an additional annual supplement of five thousand dollars ($5,000), which may be in excess of the twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) limitation on supplements set forth in subdivision (c)(2).

In addition to the base salary provided by subsection (a), if a general sessions judge in a Class 7 county has or by operation of law obtains any of the following jurisdictions, the general sessions judge shall receive an annual supplement in the amounts indicated below:

Juvenile jurisdiction $7,500

Probate 2,500

Domestic relations 2,500

Workers' compensation 2,500

Regardless of the kind or amount of additional jurisdiction a Class 7 judge may have, the judge shall not receive annual supplements in excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

On July 1, 1991, the base salaries established by this section shall be adjusted in accordance with subdivision (e)(2) to reflect the percentage of change in the average consumer price index (all items — city average) as published by the United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, between calendar year 1989 and calendar year 1990. Each succeeding July 1, a similar adjustment shall be made upon the percentage of change in the average consumer price index between the two (2) calendar years preceding July 1 of the year in which the adjustment is made. However, no reduction shall be made by way of adjustment on account of any decrease in the average consumer price index between the two (2) successive calendar years.

For each two percent (2%) increase in the average consumer price index between two (2) successive calendar years, the base salaries shall be adjusted by one percent (1%). No annual adjustment shall exceed four percent (4%) regardless of the increase in the average consumer price index between any two (2) successive calendar years. Annual adjustments shall be made upon the base salary set out in subsection (a) and the adjustment shall not include any supplement that may be received pursuant to subsection (b) or (c).

The compensation, supplement and annual adjustment provisions of this section are to be construed as minimum levels. Nothing in this part shall be construed as prohibiting a county, by private act, from compensating its general sessions judge or judges at levels in excess of what is required by this part. Any private or public act in effect on September 1, 1990, that provides greater compensation for a general sessions judge than is required by this section shall, to the extent of the judge's amount of compensation, prevail over this part, and the base salary of the judge shall be the salary paid to the holder of that office on August 31, 1990, pursuant to such public or private act, plus a percentage increase equivalent to the same percentage increase given by subsection (a) to a judge of a Class 6 county. Nothing in this part shall prevent a county from establishing and funding the position of part-time general sessions judge in a county with a full-time general sessions judge.

Notwithstanding any provision of law or this part to the contrary, no judge of a general sessions court shall be paid a salary that is greater than the salary paid to a judge of a circuit court.

Effective September 1, 1998, the annual salary for a general sessions court judge shall be increased over the annual compensation and supplements and annual adjustments that each judge actually received as of August 31, 1998, by the lesser of:

Ten thousand dollars ($10,000); or

Twenty percent (20%) of the annual compensation and supplements and annual adjustments as of August 31, 1998.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, each full-time general sessions court judge in a county shall receive the same compensation as the most highly compensated general sessions court judge in that county if the judges have the same jurisdiction.

Instead of the annual adjustments authorized in subsection (e), on July 1, 1999, and each succeeding July 1, the base salaries as adjusted annually and supplements as adjusted annually established by this section shall be adjusted in accordance with § 8-23-103.

The compensation, supplement and annual adjustment provisions of this section are to be construed as minimum levels. The compensation schedule established by this part is a comprehensive plan, and no salary supplement in excess of the supplements provided by this part shall be available to a general sessions judge unless expressly provided and funded by a private act.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a judge of a court of general sessions may not be paid compensation based on both this part and the compensation provisions in a private act.

Nothing in this part shall be construed as prohibiting a county, by private act, from compensating its general sessions judge or judges at levels in excess of what is required by this part. Any private or public act in effect on September 1, 1998, that provides greater compensation for a general sessions judge than is required by this section shall, to the extent of the judge's amount of compensation, prevail over this part, and the base salary of the judge shall be the salary paid to the holder of that office on August 31, 1998, pursuant to the public or private act plus a percentage increase equivalent to the same percentage increase given by subdivision (h)(1) to a judge of a Class 6 county determined as of August 31, 1998.

Notwithstanding any law or public chapter to the contrary, effective September 1, 2006, the annual salary for a general sessions court judge who is compensated under this section shall be increased over the annual compensation and supplements and annual adjustments that each judge actually received as of August 31, 2006, by the lesser of:

Ten thousand dollars ($10,000); or

Twenty percent (20%) of the annual compensation and supplements and annual adjustments as of August 31, 2006.

A judge of a general sessions court may not be paid compensation based on both this part and the compensation provisions of a private act.

Notwithstanding any provision of this subsection (i) to the contrary, each general sessions court judge in a Class 1 county who is compensated under this section shall receive the same compensation as the most highly compensated general sessions court judge in a Class 1 county who is compensated under this section.

Notwithstanding any provision of this subsection (i) to the contrary, each general sessions court judge in a Class 2-7 county who is compensated under this section and who receives the maximum amount of annual supplements shall receive the same compensation as the most highly compensated general sessions court judge in the same county classification who is compensated under this section. All other general sessions court judges in Class 2-7 counties who are compensated under this section shall receive the same compensation as the most highly compensated general sessions court judge in the same county classification with the same jurisdiction who is compensated under this section; provided, however, that no judge shall be paid a salary that reflects jurisdictional supplements that the judge is not entitled to exercise by law.

Instead of the annual adjustments authorized in subsection (e), on July 1, 2007, and each succeeding July 1, the annual compensation and supplements and annual adjustments established under this section shall be adjusted in accordance with § 8-23-103.

Nothing in this part shall be construed as prohibiting a county, by public or private act, from compensating its general sessions court judge or judges at levels in excess of what is required by this section. Any public or private act in effect on September 1, 2006, that provides greater compensation for a general sessions court judge than is required by this section shall, to the extent of the judge's amount of compensation, prevail over this section. Notwithstanding any provision of this subsection (i) to the contrary, a general sessions court judge in a Class 6 county who receives no supplements and who is compensated under the provisions of a private or public act and not under this section shall receive the same increase provided in subdivision (i)(1).

On or before July 15, 2006, each general sessions court judge shall certify to the administrative office of the courts (AOC) the total amount of the judge's actual compensation as of August 31, 2006, the jurisdictions exercised by the judge, the legal basis for exercising the jurisdiction, and whether the judge is compensated under this section or under a public or private act. Included in the information submitted by the judge to the AOC shall be a certification of the county's chief financial officer of the actual compensation of the judge as of August 31, 2006, or other verifiable proof of the judge's actual compensation. When all judges have certified the required information to the AOC, the AOC shall report to each general sessions court judge the amount of compensation to be paid to the general sessions court judge beginning on September 1, 2006, based on the information provided by the judge. Thereafter, when a new court is created, a new judge takes office or any similar change occurs, or upon the completion of a new federal census, the administrative office of the courts shall report the amount of compensation to be paid to any judge affected by the change.

The judges of the general sessions court in any county with a population of not less than three hundred eighty-two thousand (382,000) nor more than three hundred eighty-two thousand one hundred (382,100), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, and that has a charter form of government shall receive the same annual compensation as the general sessions judges in those counties with a metropolitan form of government and a population in excess of five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

No general sessions judge who engages in the private practice of law shall receive any increase in salary pursuant to this subsection (i), if the judge is prohibited by law from engaging in private practice.

Notwithstanding any provision of law or this part to the contrary, no judge of a general sessions court shall be paid a salary which is greater than the salary paid to a judge of a circuit court.

In addition to the base salary provided by this section, a judge of the general sessions court in any county with a population of not less than eighteen thousand three hundred one (18,301) nor more than eighteen thousand four hundred (18,400), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, shall receive an additional twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) in salary upon adoption of a resolution by a two-thirds (2/3) majority vote of the county legislative body approving the increased salary and if such position is full time.

Acts 1988, ch. 698, § 3; 1990, ch. 637, § 2; 1997, ch. 555, §§ 2, 5; 1998, ch. 1131, § 1; 2000, ch. 947, § 8A; 2002, ch. 723, §§ 2, 3; 2005, ch. 324, § 1; 2006, ch. 957, §§ 1, 2; 2018, ch. 921, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

For the fiscal year county officials salary schedule, see the County Technical Assistance Service web site at http:// www.ctas.tennessee.edu.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2005, ch. 324, § 1 purported to amend subdivision (a)(1), effective September 1, 2006. Acts 2006, ch. 957, § 2 repealed Acts 2005, ch. 324. The amendment by ch. 324, if it had taken effect, would have amended subdivision (a)(1) to read: “Effective September 1, 2006, general sessions judges in counties of the first class shall be paid a salary equivalent to ninety-seven and one-half percent (97.5%) of the salary paid to a circuit court judge.”

For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added (k).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 921, § 3. May 1, 2018.

Attorney General Opinions. Coffee County general sessions judge entitled to annual supplement, OAG 94-004 (1/11/94).

Salary supplements for juvenile court jurisdiction, OAG 94-044 (4/4/94).

Nonlawyer judges, eligibility, OAG 94-84 (8/5/94).

Compensation of juvenile court referee in mental health commitment proceedings, OAG 94-121 (10/10/94).

Applicability to municipal judges, OAG 98-013 (1/9/98).

Salary of general sessions' judge in excess of statutory requirements, OAG 98-0141 (8/7/98).

In determining an increase in salary under T.C.A. § 16-15-5003(i)(1) (now T.C.A. § 16-15-5003(h)(1)) the base amount is the annual compensation (with supplements and annual adjustments) a judge actually received as of August 31, 1998; thus, under applicable private and public acts, the base salary is the higher of $ 36,730, the salary payable to a general county officer in a county of the sixth class, or the sum of $ 20,000 plus required cost-of-living adjustments, plus a $ 10,000 supplement for juvenile and domestic relations jurisdiction, OAG 00-165 (12/20/00).

The current salary for a Class 7 general sessions judge who exercised juvenile and domestic relations jurisdictions was the base salary, with annual adjustments, and jurisdictional supplements, increased as required under T.C.A. § 16-15-5003(i)(1) (now T.C.A. § 16-15-5003(h)(1)), which provided for an increase of $ 10,000 or 20 percent, whichever was less, of the salary the judge actually received on August 31, 1998, plus annual adjustments on the entire amount to reflect changes in the consumer price index, OAG 00-190 (12/20/00).

An increase in salary resulting from a change in the class of the county is payable as of the effective date of a census, OAG 00-190 (12/20/00).

A county which was a second class county under the 1990 census and which becomes a first class county under the 2000 census should determine the compensation of its general sessions judge in the following manner: (1) The new base salary should be $ 70,000, plus all cost of living adjustments required for that salary from July 1, 1990, to July 1, 1998; (2) To this figure should be added the actual one-time increase made to the general sessions judge's salary effective September 1, 1998; (3) To this figure should be added the cost of living adjustments required for that salary on July 1, 1999, and July 1, 2000; and (4) The total salary may not be higher than the salary paid to a judge of a circuit court, OAG 01-024 (2/15/01).

For the remainder of the judge's original term, the salary of the general sessions judge in a first class county who took office in 1996 for the remainder of a term that began in 1990 was determined as follows: (1) A base salary of $ 70,000 salary, plus annual adjustments to the base; (2) As of 1996, this figure included all of the annual adjustments made through July 1, 1995, for that salary due before July 1, 1996, and all the annual adjustments made through July 1, 1996, for the salary due thereafter; and (3) Annual adjustments would then be added the subsequent July 1, 1997, and July 1, 1998, OAG 01-029 (3/5/01).

For a new term beginning in 1998, the salary of the general sessions judge in a first class county who took office in 1996 for the remainder of a term that began in 1990 was determined as follows: (1) A $ 70,000 base salary, plus all annual adjustments due until July 1, 1998; and (2) To this sum was added the one-time increase of $ 10,000 effective September 1, 1998, OAG 01-029 (3/5/01).

Excluding jurisdictional supplements from the salary for judges in counties that have moved into counties of the first class as a result of the 2000 census does not violate legislative intent that judges in the same class counties with the same jurisdictions be paid equal salaries, OAG 01-107 (6/29/01).

The equal protection clause of U.S. Const. Amend. XIV, § 1 is not violated by the calculation of salaries of different general sessions judges exercising the same jurisdiction in counties of the first class in different manners, i.e, by judges who were receiving supplements under former T.C.A. § 16-15-205 and Opinion 94-44 and who were reelected to office receiving a salary that continues to reflect those supplements, while judges in counties that moved into the first class as a result of the 2000 census receiving a salary that does not reflect those supplements, OAG 01-107 (6/29/01).

Where a judge in a county of the sixth class received an increase equal to 20 percent of the salary the judge was actually receiving as of August 31, 1998, and that county, under the 2000 census results, becomes a county of the fifth class, the judge's salary from 2000 on should not include an increase equal to 20 percent of the salary that judge would have been receiving if the county had been in the fifth class as of August 31, 1998, OAG 01-108 (6/29/01).

Where the increase in the consumer price index during a year was three percent, a judge is entitled to an adjustment of one percent, rather than one and one-half percent, as T.C.A. § 16-15-5003 provides that an adjustment will be made to reflect two percent incremental changes, OAG 01-108 (6/29/01).

Where, under the results of the 2000 census, a county became a county in the first class for purposes of calculating its general sessions judge's salary, the judge's new salary would be the $ 70,000 base for class one judges, increased by cost of living increases payable under T.C.A. 16-15-5003(f) (now T.C.A. § 16-15-5003(e)) to July 30, 1998, plus $ 10,000 or 20 percent of the salary the judge was actually receiving as of August 31, 1998, whichever was greater, OAG 01-109 (7/6/01).

The equal protection clauses of the Tennessee and United States Constitution are not violated to the extent that T.C.A. § 16-15-5003 provides for different salaries for judges in counties of the first class who exercise the same jurisdiction since the discrepancies provided for by the statute are rationally related to a legitimate state interest in retaining experienced judges, OAG 01-110 (7/6/01).

To the extent that the statute provides for different salaries for judges in counties of the first class who exercise the same jurisdiction, the statute is not internally inconsistent or contradictory as it provides that differently situated judges in counties of the first class will receive different salary levels, OAG 01-110 (7/6/01).

In a county which was a sixth class county under the 1990 census and which becomes a fifth class county under the 2000 census, the new salary for its general sessions judge is the base salary for a judge in a county of the fifth class, plus cost-of-living increases to the base under T.C.A. 16-15-5003(f) (now T.C.A. § 16-15-5003(e)), plus the increase the judge actually received on September 1, 1998, and applicable jurisdictional supplements for a judge in a county of the fifth class, plus cost-of-living increases under T.C.A. 16-15-5003(i)(3) (now T.C.A. § 16-15-5003(h)(3)),OAG 01-122 (8/7/01).

Cited: Tenn. Div. of the United Daughters of the Confederacy v. Vanderbilt Univ., 174 S.W.3d 98, 2005 Tenn. App. LEXIS 272 (Tenn. Ct. App. 2005).

16-15-5004. Concurrent jurisdiction — Domestic relations — Workers' compensation — Probate cases — Mental commitments.

In any county having a population of not less than seventy-seven thousand seven hundred (77,700) nor more than seventy-seven thousand eight hundred (77,800), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, on July 1 of each year, the general session judges shall have concurrent jurisdiction with the circuit and chancery courts over domestic relations cases. When the general sessions court of any such county is exercising domestic relations jurisdiction under the authority conferred by this subsection (a) or § 16-15-501(b)(4), the clerk and master of the county shall serve as the clerk of the general sessions court.

In counties of the second class having a population of not less than forty-seven thousand five hundred seventy-five (47,575) nor more than forty-seven thousand six hundred fifteen (47,615), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census:

The general sessions court shall have concurrent jurisdiction with the circuit and chancery courts over domestic relations cases. The circuit court clerk shall be designated as the clerk of the general sessions domestic relations court; and

The base salary of the general sessions judge in those counties shall be as provided by this part.

In counties of the third class having a population of not less than thirty-two thousand six hundred (32,600) nor more than thirty-two thousand seven hundred (32,700), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census:

The general sessions court shall have concurrent jurisdiction with the circuit and chancery courts over workers' compensation cases. The clerk and master of the chancery court shall be designated as the clerk of the general sessions workers' compensation court; and

The base salary of the general sessions judge in the counties shall be as provided by this part.

In counties of the sixth class having a population of not less than fourteen thousand eight hundred (14,800) nor more than fourteen thousand eight hundred fifty (14,850), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census:

The general sessions court shall have concurrent jurisdiction with the circuit and chancery courts over domestic relations cases, probate cases and mental health commitments; and

Regardless of the court exercising jurisdiction, domestic relations cases, probate cases and mental health commitments shall continue to be filed in the clerk's office where the cases are currently filed. When the general sessions court of the county is exercising any of the jurisdiction set out in subdivision (d)(1), the appropriate clerk shall also serve as the clerk of the general sessions court.

In counties of the fourth class having a population of not less than twenty five thousand three hundred (25,300) nor more than twenty five thousand three hundred fifty (25,350), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census:

The general sessions court shall have concurrent jurisdiction with the circuit and chancery courts over probate cases and mental health commitments; and

Regardless of the court exercising jurisdiction, probate cases and mental health commitments shall continue to be filed in the clerk's office where the cases are currently filed.

Notwithstanding the limitation on annual supplements in § 16-15-5003(c)(2), the judge of the court of general sessions to which subdivision (e)(1) is applicable shall receive the total amount of the supplements authorized by law for the judge.

This subsection (e) shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the legislative body of any county to which it may apply. Its approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by the presiding officer of the county legislative body and certified to the secretary of state.

In counties of the fourth class having a population of not less than twenty-six thousand one hundred (26,100) nor more than twenty-six thousand two hundred (26,200), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census:

The general sessions court shall have concurrent jurisdiction with the circuit and chancery courts over workers' compensation cases, divorce and all other domestic relations cases, mental health commitment cases, probate cases and cases involving decedents' estates; and

Regardless of the court exercising jurisdiction, workers' compensation cases, divorce and all other domestic relations cases, mental health commitment cases, probate cases and cases involving decedents' estates shall continue to be filed in the clerk's office where the cases were filed on June 30, 1999.

Subdivision (f)(1) shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the legislative body of any county to which it may apply. Its approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by the presiding officer of the county legislative body and certified to the secretary of state.

In counties of the sixth class having a population of not less than seventeen thousand two hundred fifty (17,250) nor more than seventeen thousand five hundred fifty (17,550), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census:

The general sessions court has concurrent jurisdiction with the circuit and chancery courts over divorce and all other domestic relations cases, mental health commitment cases, probate cases and cases involving decedents' estates.

Regardless of the court exercising jurisdiction, divorce and all other domestic relations cases, mental health commitment cases, probate cases and cases involving decedents' estates shall continue to be filed in the clerk's office where the cases were filed on June 30, 2000.

Subdivision (g)(1) shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the legislative body of any county to which it applies. Its approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by the presiding officer of the legislative body and certified to the secretary of state.

Acts 1988, ch. 698, §§ 9, 12, 13; 1989, ch. 81, §§ 1, 3; 1991, ch. 396, § 1; 1991, ch. 501, §§ 1, 2; 1999, ch. 352, § 1; 2000, ch. 877, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Jurisdiction, title 16, ch. 15, part 5.

Attorney General Opinions. In those counties meeting the population requirements of T.C.A. § 16-15-5004(d), a party who wishes to invoke the jurisdiction of the general sessions court in a domestic relations, probate, or mental health commitment case should make that choice of forum clear in the complaint but should file the complaint with the clerk of the court where such cases were customarily filed before May 22, 1991, OAG 00-182 (12/7/00).

16-15-5005. Judges to be licensed — Vacancies.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all persons occupying the office of general sessions judge shall be licensed to practice law in this state.

Any person serving in the office of general sessions judge on August 1, 1990, who is not a licensed attorney may seek reelection to the position and serve as a general sessions judge as long as the person is continuously reelected.

If a vacancy occurs in the office of a non-attorney general sessions judge elected pursuant to this section, the vacancy shall be filled by a person licensed to practice law and the qualifications set out in subdivision (a)(1) shall thereafter apply to that position.

Notwithstanding this section, if a vacancy occurs in the office of general sessions judge and no licensed attorney appears at the meeting when the vacancy is being filled by the county legislative body and offers to become a candidate for the office, the vacancy may be filled by a person not licensed to practice law.

If no licensed attorney qualifies for an election being held to fill the office of general sessions judge, or the only attorney candidate legally withdraws, the county election commission shall extend the qualification deadline for a period of ten (10) days, during which period persons not licensed to practice law may qualify to seek the office of general sessions judge.

Subdivision (b)(2) shall not apply in counties having a population of not less than fifty-one thousand twenty-five (51,025) nor more than fifty-one thousand one hundred twenty-five (51,125), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 1988, ch. 698, § 5; 1990, ch. 637, §§ 3, 4; 1990, ch. 862, § 1; 1990, ch. 1017, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Qualifications of judges, § 16-15-201.

Attorney General Opinions. Candidates for office required to be licensed, OAG 97-110 (8/06/97).

Cited: In re Williams, 987 S.W.2d 837, 1998 Tenn. LEXIS 453 (Tenn. 1998).